Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.736

Print shop services—Bid solicitations—Confidential information.

(1) State agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of higher education requiring the services of a print shop may use public printing services provided by the department. If a print job is put out for bid, the department must be included in the bid solicitation. All solicitations must be posted on the state's common vendor registration and bid notification system and results provided to the department. All bid specifications must encourage the use of recycled paper and biodegradable ink must be used if feasible for the print job.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department shall print all agency materials that contain sensitive or personally identifiable information not publicly available.

(b) If it is more economically feasible to contract with a private vendor for the printing of agency materials that contain sensitive or personally identifiable information, the department shall require the vendor to enter into a confidentiality agreement with the department to protect the information that is provided as part of the print job.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 309.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.